Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.050

Registered, foundation, and breeder planting stock—Availability to producers and commercial growers—Restrictions on use—Fees.

For purposes of maintaining and/or improving the genetic characteristics and freedom from infection by plant pests of any registered, foundation, and breeder planting stock, the director may acquire, propagate, and distribute registered, foundation, and breeder planting stock to producers and commercial growers. The director may charge fees for the planting stock and may place restrictions on its use and propagation by producers and commercial growers.

[ 1999 c 144 s 6; 1961 c 83 s 5.]